Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4615
Trade secret information; confidential; exceptions.

All information reported to or otherwise obtained by the commission or its duly authorized representatives pursuant to the Uniform Standard Code for Manufactured Homes and Recreational Vehicles which contains or relates to a trade secret, or which, if disclosed, would put the person furnishing such information at a substantial competitive disadvantage, shall be considered confidential, except that such information may be disclosed to other officers or employees concerned with carrying out the code or, when relevant, in any proceeding under the code.

Laws 1975, LB 300, § 14;

Laws 1985, LB 313, § 18;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 139.